Hawaii statutes.
§603-29 Order to show cause. [Repeal
and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.] Whenever a
complaint has been filed in circuit court alleging leased or rented personal
property the value of which is $5,000 or more, has been retained by the defendant
fourteen days after the termination of the lease or rental contract, either by
passage of time or by reason of any default under the terms and conditions of
the lease or rental contract, the plaintiff may petition the court for an order
to show cause.

Upon the filing of the petition with a copy of
the lease or rental contract and an affidavit sworn to by the plaintiff or some
competent affiant setting forth a statement of facts sufficient to show the
termination of the lease or rental contract, the court may issue an order
directing the defendant to either return the leased or rented personal property
to the plaintiff or to appear and show cause for the possession at such time as
the court shall direct but not later than ten days from the date of service of
the order to show cause. The order to show cause shall also provide that
if the leased or rented personal property is not returned to the plaintiff
prior to the hearing, the defendant shall, if reasonably feasible, produce the
property at the hearing. If, at the hearing, it is proved to the
satisfaction of the court that the plaintiff is entitled to possession of the
leased or rented personal property, it shall issue an order directed to the
sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil process server
from the department of public safety's list under section 353C-10
commanding the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil
process server to seize the personal property therein described and to deliver
the same to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's agent. Service of the order
to show cause shall be as provided by law or rule of court for cases in the
circuit courts, or by registered mail or by certified mail with return receipt
showing delivery within the circuit. [L 1980, c 171, §5; am L 1981, c 176, §5;
gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 2012, c 142, §1;
am L 2013, c 116, §§3, 25(2)]

Cross References

Sheriff, etc., see §26-14.6.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next